Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201882-130
Willa Cather; real property; legal description.

The real property acquired pursuant to section 82-129 is more particularly described as follows:

(1) The Cather House described as lots 1, 2, and 3, block 24, original town of Red Cloud, Webster County, Nebraska;

(2) The Garber Bank described as lot 21, block 31, original town of Red Cloud, Webster County, Nebraska;

(3) The Grace Episcopal Church described as lots 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 24, block 6, original town, now the city of Red Cloud, Webster County, Nebraska;

(4) The St. Juliana Catholic Church described as lots 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, and 22, block 3, Railroad addition to the city of Red Cloud, Webster County, Nebraska;

(5) The Burlington Depot described as lots 10, 11, 12, and 13, block 19, Railroad addition to the city of Red Cloud, Webster County, Nebraska; and

(6) The Antonia Farmhouse described as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of section 27, township 4 north, range 11 west of the sixth principal meridian, Webster County, Nebraska, thence south 895 feet; thence west 155 feet to the point of beginning; thence west a distance of 90 feet; thence south at a right angle a distance of 137 feet; thence east at a right angle a distance of 90 feet; thence north a distance of 137 feet to the point of beginning.

Laws 1978, LB 567, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB379, § 5.
April 5, 2018